California, session 20252026, SB1414.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 6.11 (commencing with Section 21596) is added to Division 21 of the Elections Code, to read: CHAPTER 6.11. County of San Bernardino Citizens Redistricting Commission21596. (a) As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Board” means the Board of Supervisors of the County of San Bernardino.(2) “Commission” means the Citizens Redistricting Commission in the County of San Bernardino established pursuant to Section 21596.2.(b) Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, the definitions in Section 23000 apply for purposes of this chapter.21596.1. There is, in the County of San Bernardino, a Citizens Redistricting Commission. In the year following the year in which the decennial federal census is taken, the commission shall adjust the boundary lines of the supervisorial districts of the board in accordance with this chapter.21596.2. (a) The commission shall be created no later than December 31, 2030, and in each year ending in the number zero thereafter.(b) The selection process is designed to produce a commission that is independent from the influence of the board and reasonably representative of the county’s diversity.(c) In addition to the requirements of this chapter, the commission, its members, and applicants are subject to Section 23003, except to the extent this chapter imposes additional or more restrictive requirements.(d) The commission shall consist of 14 commissioners. The political party preferences of the commissioners, as shown on the commissioners’ most recent affidavits of registration, shall be as proportional as possible to the total number of voters who are registered with each political party in the County of San Bernardino, or who decline to state or do not indicate a party preference, as determined by registration at the most recent statewide election. However, the political party or no party preferences of the commissioners are not required to be exactly the same as the proportion of political party and no party preferences among the registered voters of the county. At least one commissioner shall reside in each of the five existing supervisorial districts of the board.(e) Each commissioner shall meet all of the following qualifications:(1) Be a resident of the County of San Bernardino.(2) Be a voter who has been continuously registered in the County of San Bernardino with the same political party or unaffiliated with a political party and who has not changed political party affiliation for five or more years immediately preceding the date of their appointment to the commission.(3) Have voted in at least one of the last three statewide elections immediately preceding their application to be a commissioner.(4) Within the eight years immediately preceding the date of application to the commission, neither the applicant, nor an immediate a family member of the applicant, has done any of the following:(A) Met the criteria for a prohibition specified in Section 23003.(B) Held or sought local, state, or federal office representing the County of San Bernardino.(C) Served as an employee of, or paid consultant for, a candidate for local, state, or federal office representing the County of San Bernardino, to any extent not already prohibited by Section 23003.(D) Been a registered lobbyist at the federal, state, or local level.(5) Possess experience that demonstrates analytical skills relevant to the redistricting process and voting rights, and possess the ability to comprehend and apply the applicable state and federal legal requirements.(6) Possess experience that demonstrates an ability to be impartial.(7) Possess experience that demonstrates an appreciation for the diverse demographics and geography of the County of San Bernardino.(f) An interested person meeting the qualifications specified in subdivision (e) may submit an application to the county elections official to be considered for membership on the commission. The county elections official shall review the applications and eliminate applicants who do not meet the specified qualifications.(g) (1) From the pool of qualified applicants, the county elections official shall select 60 of the most qualified applicants, taking into account the requirements described in subdivision (d). The county elections official shall make public the names of the 60 most qualified applicants for at least 30 days. The county elections official shall not communicate with a member of the board, or an agent for a member of the board, about any matter related to the nomination process or applicants before the publication of the list of the 60 most qualified applicants.(2) During the period described in paragraph (1), the county elections official may eliminate any of the previously selected applicants if the official becomes aware that the applicant does not meet the qualifications specified in subdivision (e).(h) (1) After complying with the requirements of subdivision (g), the county elections official shall create a subpool for each of the five existing supervisorial districts of the board.(2) (A) At a regularly scheduled meeting of the board, the Auditor-Controller of the County of San Bernardino shall conduct a random drawing to select one commissioner from each of the five subpools established by the county elections official.(B) After completing the random drawing pursuant to subparagraph (A), at the same meeting of the board, the Auditor-Controller shall conduct a random drawing from all of the remaining applicants, without respect to subpools, to select three additional commissioners.(i) (1) The eight selected commissioners shall review the remaining names in the subpools of applicants and shall appoint six additional applicants to the commission.(2) The six appointees shall be chosen based on relevant experience, analytical skills, and ability to be impartial, and to ensure that the commission reflects the county’s diversity, including racial, ethnic, geographic, and gender diversity. However, formulas or specific ratios shall not be applied for this purpose. The eight commissioners shall also consider political party preference, selecting applicants so that the political party preference of the commissioners complies with subdivision (c).21596.3. (a) A commissioner shall apply this chapter in a manner that is impartial and that reinforces public confidence in the integrity of the redistricting process.(b) The term of office of each commissioner expires upon the appointment of the first commissioner of the succeeding commission.(c) Nine commissioners shall constitute a quorum. Nine or more affirmative votes shall be required for any official action.(d) (1) The commission shall not retain a consultant who would not be qualified as an applicant pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (e) of Section 21596.2 or subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 23003.(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “consultant” means a person, whether or not compensated, retained to advise the commission or a commissioner regarding any aspect of the redistricting process.(e) Each commissioner shall be a designated employee for purposes of the conflict of interest code adopted by the County of San Bernardino pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 87300) of Chapter 7 of Title 9 of the Government Code.(f) (1) A commissioner shall not communicate with any individual or organization regarding redistricting matters outside of a public hearing.(2) This subdivision does not do either of the following:(A) Restrict the commission from communicating with the staff of the legislative body of the local jurisdiction regarding administrative matters of the commission.(B) Restrict a commissioner from directly communicating with another commissioner, commission staff, legal counsel, or consultants retained by the commission.(g) (1) The commission shall create bylaws or other rules of procedure for the purpose of conducting orderly public hearings and communication.(2) The bylaws shall include provisions to address both of the following:(A) How the commission will fill a vacancy following the resignation or removal of a commissioner.(B) A process consistent with Section 21596.6 for removal of a commissioner.21596.4. (a) The commission shall establish single-member supervisorial districts for the board pursuant to a mapping process using the criteria set forth in Section 21130.(b) (1) The commission shall comply with the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).(2) (A) Before the commission draws a map, the commission shall conduct at least seven public hearings, to take place over a period of no fewer than 30 days, with at least one public hearing held in each supervisorial district.(B) In the event any state or local health order prohibits large gatherings, the commission may modify the location of the hearings, including through the use of virtual hearings that use technology to permit remote viewing and participation, to the extent required to comply with public health requirements. If the commission modifies the location of a hearing, it shall provide opportunities to view and listen to proceedings by video, to listen to proceedings by phone, and to provide public comment by phone and in writing with no limitation on the number of commenters. The commission shall, to the greatest extent practicable, provide an opportunity for in-person participation for at least one hearing in each supervisorial district. Methods for providing in-person participation may include setting up multiple rooms with audiovisual connections to the hearing, allowing community members to make appointments to make public comment, providing personal protective equipment, or holding hearings in outdoor spaces.(3) After the commission draws a draft map, the commission shall do both of the following:(A) Post the map for public comment on the website of the County of San Bernardino.(B) Conduct at least three public hearings to take place over a period of no fewer than 30 days before the hearing at which the new boundaries are adopted.(4) (A) The commission shall establish and make available to the public a calendar of all public hearings described in paragraphs (2) and (3). Hearings shall be scheduled at various times and days of the week to accommodate a variety of work schedules and to reach as large an audience as possible.(B) Notwithstanding Section 54954.2 of the Government Code, the commission shall post the agenda for the public hearings described in paragraphs (2) and (3) at least seven days before the hearings. The agenda for a public hearing required by paragraph (3) shall include a copy of the draft map.(5) (A) The commission shall arrange for the live translation of a hearing held pursuant to this chapter in an applicable language if a request for translation is made at least 24 hours before the hearing.(B) For purposes of this subdivision, an “applicable language” means a language for which the number of residents of the County of San Bernardino who are members of a language minority is greater than or equal to 3 percent of the total voting age residents of the county.(6) The commission shall take steps to encourage county residents to participate in the redistricting public review process. These steps may include:(A) Providing information through media, social media, and public service announcements.(B) Coordinating with community organizations.(C) Posting information on the website of the County of San Bernardino that explains the redistricting process and includes a notice of each public hearing and the procedures for testifying during a hearing or submitting written testimony directly to the commission.(7) The board shall take all steps necessary to ensure that a complete and accurate computerized database is available for redistricting, and that procedures are in place to provide to the public ready access to redistricting data and computer software equivalent to what is available to the commissioners.(8) The county shall provide for reasonable funding and staffing for the commission.(9) All records of the commission relating to redistricting, and all data considered by the commission in drawing a draft map or the final map, are public records.(10) The commission shall ensure that all outreach materials, public notifications, agendas, and content on its website, including instructions for testifying and submitting written public testimony, are translated in all applicable languages.(c) (1) The commission shall adopt a redistricting plan adjusting the boundaries of the supervisorial districts and shall file the plan with the county elections official by the map adoption deadline set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 21140. The commission shall not release a draft map before the date set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 21160.(2) The plan shall be subject to referendum in the same manner as ordinances.(3) The commission shall issue, with the final map, a report that explains the basis on which the commission made its decisions in achieving compliance with the criteria described in subdivision (a).21596.5 (a) A commissioner shall be ineligible for a period of five years beginning from the date of appointment to hold elective public office at the federal, state, or local level in this state.(b) A commissioner shall be ineligible for a period of three years beginning from the date of appointment to do any of the following:(1) Hold appointive federal, state, or local public office, serve as paid staff for, or as a paid consultant to, the Board of Equalization, the Congress, the Legislature, or any individual legislator, or register as a federal, state, or local lobbyist in this state.(2) Accept employment as a staff member of, or a consultant to, an elected official or candidate for elective office of the County of San Bernardino.(3) Receive a noncompetitively bid contract with the County of San Bernardino.(c) While serving on the commission, a commissioner shall not endorse, work for, volunteer for, or make a campaign contribution to a candidate for an elective office of the County of San Bernardino.21596.6. (a) (1) The commission may remove a commissioner for any of the following reasons:(A) Substantial neglect of duty.(B) Gross misconduct in office.(C) Causing the commission to be unable to discharge its duties with nine affirmative votes.(D) The commission discovers that the commissioner did not meet the required qualifications at the time of appointment.(E) Due to a change in circumstances, the commissioner no longer meets the required qualifications.(2) A commissioner who is subject to removal shall not vote on their own removal.(b) Before removal pursuant to subdivision (a), a commissioner is entitled to receive all of the following from the commission:(1) The reasons for their proposed removal, in writing.(2) At least one week’s written notice of the public hearing at which the commission will vote on their proposed removal.(3) The opportunity to respond to or rebut the reasons for their removal in writing and at the public hearing described in paragraph (2).(c) The commission may employ legal counsel in seeking removal of a commissioner pursuant to this section.(d) The decision of the commission to remove a commissioner pursuant to this section is final, nonappealable, and is not subject to judicial review.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special law is necessary and that a general law cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique circumstances facing the County of San Bernardino.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.